Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Freemasons

48-102-201. Privileges and benefits generally.

The order of freemasons shall be entitled to all the privileges and benefits of part 1 of this chapter to the same extent and upon the same conditions, except that the subordinate lodges of Free and Accepted Masonry, as chartered by the grand lodge of the state of Tennessee, are authorized to sell and convey their real property without the permission of the grand lodge or the grand master.

Acts 1847-1848, ch. 60, § 4; Shan., § 2577a7; Code 1932, § 4422; Acts 1967, ch. 38, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1503, 48-1505, 48-1509, 48-4-201.

48-102-202. Ownership of real property.

The officers and members of a masonic lodge may purchase or take by deed such quantity of ground for the purpose of building a hall or temple, or for a burial place, as may be necessary. The deed shall vest the legal title to the same in such officers and members and their successors.

Code 1858, § 1516 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 154); Shan., § 2571; mod. Code 1932, § 4410; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1510, 48-4-202.

Cross-References. Excise tax exemption of corporations formed to own meeting places, § 67-4-2008.

48-102-203. Coupon bonds for construction.

All masonic lodges which hold real estate to the value of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more have the power to issue coupon bonds from time to time to an amount not exceeding a total of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), bearing six percent (6%) interest per annum, payable semiannually, for the purpose of erecting a building or hall upon same.

The coupon bonds may be issued in sums of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), fifty dollars ($50.00), one hundred dollars ($100), five hundred dollars ($500), and one thousand dollars ($1,000), as may be desired.

The coupon bonds shall not have more than twenty (20) years in which to mature, and may be taken up by the lodge at any time after five (5) years from their issuance.

Any masonic lodge which shall issue coupon bonds under this section may execute a mortgage upon its real estate to secure the payment of the bonds and coupons.

The worshipful master and wardens or other proper officers of the lodge have the power to issue the bonds and coupons and execute the mortgage provided for in this section whenever they have been instructed by a meeting of their lodge to do so.

Acts 1883, ch. 240, §§ 1-5; 1885, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., §§ 2572, 2574-2577; Code 1932, §§ 4411-4415; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1511 — 48-1515, 48-4-203.